Utah statutes.
70A-3-401.   Signature.

(1)  A person is not liable on an instrument unless:

(a)  the person signed the instrument; or

(b)  the person is represented by an agent or representative who signed the instrument and the signature is binding on the represented person under Section 70A-3-402.

(2)  A signature may be made:

(a)  manually or by means of a device or machine; and

(b)  by the use of any name, including a trade or assumed name, or by a word, mark, or symbol executed or adopted by a person with present intention to authenticate a writing.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 237, 1993 General Session

